Utah statutes.
13-42-135.   Private enforcement.
(1)  If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to Subsection 13-42-125(2),
the individual may recover in a civil action all money paid or deposited by or
on behalf of the individual pursuant to the agreement, except amounts paid to
creditors, in addition to the recovery under Subsections (3)(c) and (d).
(2)  If an individual voids an agreement pursuant to Subsection 13-42-125(1),
the individual may recover in a civil action three times the total amount of
the fees, charges, money, and payments made by the individual to the provider,
in addition to the recovery under Subsection (3)(d).
(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), an individual with respect to whom a provider
violates this chapter may recover in a civil action from the provider and any
person that caused the violation:
(a)  compensatory damages for injury, including noneconomic injury, caused by
the violation;
(b)  except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4) and subject to adjustment
of the dollar amount pursuant to Subsection 13-42-132(6), with respect to a
violation of Section 13-42-117, 13-42-119, 13-42-120, 13-42-121, 13-42-122,
13-42-123, 13-42-124, or 13-42-127, or Subsection 13-42-128(1), (2), or (4),
the greater of the amount recoverable under Subsection (3)(a) or $5,000;
(c)  punitive damages; and
(d)  reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(4)  In a class action, except for a violation of Subsection 13-42-128(1)(e),
the minimum damages provided in Subsection (3)(b) do not apply.
(5)  In addition to the remedy available under Subsection (3), if a provider
violates an individual's rights under Section 13-42-120, the individual may
recover in a civil action all money paid or deposited by or on behalf of the
individual pursuant to the agreement, except for amounts paid to creditors.
(6)  A provider is not liable under this section for a violation of this
chapter if the provider proves that the violation was not intentional and
resulted from a good-faith error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures
reasonably adapted to avoid the error.  An error of legal judgment with
respect to a provider's obligations under this chapter is not a good-faith
error.  If, in connection with a violation, the provider has received more
money than authorized by an agreement or this chapter, the defense provided by
this Subsection (6) is not available unless the provider refunds the excess
within two business days of learning of the violation.
(7)  The administrator shall assist an individual in enforcing a judgment
against the surety bond or other security provided under Section 13-42-113 or
13-42-114.
